Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,141
District funds; deposits; how secured.

The depository receiving the deposit of funds of the district is hereby authorized to secure the deposit of such funds by giving security pursuant to the Public Funds Deposit Security Act, by depository bond, corporate in character, or by sufficient personal security when demanded by the board of directors of the district, such security to be approved by the board of directors of such irrigation district. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1935, c. 18, § 3, p. 94;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 46-1,106;

R.S.1943, § 46-1,141;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 29;

Laws 1999, LB 396, § 35;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 33.

Public Funds Deposit Security Act, see section 77-2386.